dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX J Y 375
SFX J   i           af         i
SFX J   i           a          i
SFX J   i           a'i        i
SFX J   i           a'u        i
SFX J   i           a'ch       i
SFX J   i           a'n        i
SFX J   i           a'r        i
SFX J   i           n          i
SFX J   i           ch         i
SFX J   i           ant        i
SFX J   i           ir         i
SFX J   i           it         i
SFX J   i           et         i
SFX J   i           ai         i
SFX J   i           ai'i       i
SFX J   i           ai'u       i
SFX J   i           ai'ch      i
SFX J   i           ai'n       i
SFX J   i           ai'r       i
SFX J   i           em         i
SFX J   i           ech        i
SFX J   i           ent        i
SFX J   i           id         i
SFX J   i           ais        i
SFX J   i           aist       i
SFX J   i           odd        i
SFX J   i           asom       i
SFX J   i           asoch      i
SFX J   i           asant      i
SFX J   i           yd         i
SFX J   i           aswn       i
SFX J   i           asit       i
SFX J   i           aset       i
SFX J   i           asai       i
SFX J   i           asai'i     i
SFX J   i           asai'u     i
SFX J   i           asai'ch    i
SFX J   i           asai'n     i
SFX J   i           asai'r     i
SFX J   i           asem       i
SFX J   i           asech      i
SFX J   i           asent      i
SFX J   i           asid       i
SFX J   i           ed         i
SFX J   i           yf         i
SFX J   i           ych        i
SFX J   i           o          i
SFX J   i           om         i
SFX J   i           och        i
SFX J   i           ont        i
SFX J   i           er         i
SFX J   i           es         i
SFX J   i           est        i
SFX J   i           ith        i
SFX J   i           iff        i
SFX J   i           on         i
SFX J   i           an         i
SFX J   y           af         y
SFX J   y           i          y
SFX J   y           i'i        y
SFX J   y           i'u        y
SFX J   y           i'ch       y
SFX J   y           i'n        y
SFX J   y           i'r        y
SFX J   y           a          y
SFX J   y           a'i        y
SFX J   y           a'u        y
SFX J   y           a'ch       y
SFX J   y           a'n        y
SFX J   y           a'r        y
SFX J   y           n          y
SFX J   y           ch         y
SFX J   y           ant        y
SFX J   y           ir         y
SFX J   y           it         y
SFX J   y           et         y
SFX J   y           ai         y
SFX J   y           ai'i       y
SFX J   y           ai'u       y
SFX J   y           ai'ch      y
SFX J   y           ai'n       y
SFX J   y           ai'r       y
SFX J   y           em         y
SFX J   y           ech        y
SFX J   y           ent        y
SFX J   y           id         y
SFX J   y           ais        y
SFX J   y           aist       y
SFX J   y           odd        y
SFX J   y           asom       y
SFX J   y           asoch      y
SFX J   y           asant      y
SFX J   y           yd         y
SFX J   y           aswn       y
SFX J   y           asit       y
SFX J   y           aset       y
SFX J   y           asai       y
SFX J   y           asai'i     y
SFX J   y           asai'u     y
SFX J   y           asai'ch    y
SFX J   y           asai'n     y
SFX J   y           asai'r     y
SFX J   y           asem       y
SFX J   y           asech      y
SFX J   y           asent      y
SFX J   y           asid       y
SFX J   y           ed         y
SFX J   y           yf         y
SFX J   y           ych        y
SFX J   y           o          y
SFX J   y           om         y
SFX J   y           och        y
SFX J   y           ont        y
SFX J   y           er         y
SFX J   y           es         y
SFX J   y           est        y
SFX J   y           ith        y
SFX J   y           iff        y
SFX J   y           on         y
SFX J   y           an         y
SFX J   a           af         a
SFX J   a           i          a
SFX J   a           i'i        a
SFX J   a           i'u        a
SFX J   a           i'ch       a
SFX J   a           i'n        a
SFX J   a           i'r        a
SFX J   a           n          a
SFX J   a           ch         a
SFX J   a           ant        a
SFX J   a           ir         a
SFX J   a           it         a
SFX J   a           et         a
SFX J   a           ai         a
SFX J   a           ai'i       a
SFX J   a           ai'u       a
SFX J   a           ai'ch      a
SFX J   a           ai'n       a
SFX J   a           ai'r       a
SFX J   a           em         a
SFX J   a           ech        a
SFX J   a           ent        a
SFX J   a           id         a
SFX J   a           ais        a
SFX J   a           aist       a
SFX J   a           odd        a
SFX J   a           asom       a
SFX J   a           asoch      a
SFX J   a           asant      a
SFX J   a           yd         a
SFX J   a           aswn       a
SFX J   a           asit       a
SFX J   a           aset       a
SFX J   a           asai       a
SFX J   a           asai'i     a
SFX J   a           asai'u     a
SFX J   a           asai'ch    a
SFX J   a           asai'n     a
SFX J   a           asai'r     a
SFX J   a           asem       a
SFX J   a           asech      a
SFX J   a           asent      a
SFX J   a           asid       a
SFX J   a           ed         a
SFX J   a           yf         a
SFX J   a           ych        a
SFX J   a           a          a
SFX J   a           om         a
SFX J   a           och        a
SFX J   a           ont        a
SFX J   a           er         a
SFX J   a           es         a
SFX J   a           est        a
SFX J   a           ith        a
SFX J   a           iff        a
SFX J   a           on         a
SFX J   a           an         a
SFX J   io          af         io
SFX J   io          a          io
SFX J   io          a'i        io
SFX J   io          a'u        io
SFX J   io          a'ch       io
SFX J   io          a'n        io
SFX J   io          a'r        io
SFX J   io          i          io
SFX J   io          i'i        io
SFX J   io          i'u        io
SFX J   io          i'ch       io
SFX J   io          i'n        io
SFX J   io          i'r        io
SFX J   io          n          io
SFX J   io          ch         io
SFX J   io          ant        io
SFX J   io          ir         io
SFX J   io          it         io
SFX J   io          et         io
SFX J   io          ai         io
SFX J   io          ai'i       io
SFX J   io          ai'u       io
SFX J   io          ai'ch      io
SFX J   io          ai'n       io
SFX J   io          ai'r       io
SFX J   io          em         io
SFX J   io          ech        io
SFX J   io          ent        io
SFX J   io          id         io
SFX J   io          ais        io
SFX J   io          aist       io
SFX J   io          odd        io
SFX J   io          asom       io
SFX J   io          asoch      io
SFX J   io          asant      io
SFX J   io          yd         io
SFX J   io          aswn       io
SFX J   io          asit       io
SFX J   io          aset       io
SFX J   io          asai       io
SFX J   io          asai'i     io
SFX J   io          asai'u     io
SFX J   io          asai'ch    io
SFX J   io          asai'n     io
SFX J   io          asai'r     io
SFX J   io          asem       io
SFX J   io          asech      io
SFX J   io          asent      io
SFX J   io          asid       io
SFX J   io          ed         io
SFX J   io          yf         io
SFX J   io          ych        io
SFX J   io          o          io
SFX J   io          om         io
SFX J   io          och        io
SFX J   io          ont        io
SFX J   io          er         io
SFX J   io          es         io
SFX J   io          est        io
SFX J   io          ith        io
SFX J   io          iff        io
SFX J   io          on         io
SFX J   io          an         io
